Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1777
Tax refund; sections applicable.

Sections 77-1778 to 77-1782 shall apply to any tax, except property taxes, collected by the Tax Commissioner to the extent that specific refund provisions have not been enacted. If there is any conflict between any specific refund statutes and the provisions of sections 77-1778 to 77-1782, the specific refund statutes shall control.

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 36;

Laws 1989, LB 762, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1041, § 3.